Georgia statutes. 
Redevelopment powers under this chapter may not be exercised by any political subdivision unless so authorized by a local law relating thereto, which local law may limit but may not expand those redevelopment powers established by this chapter as to the local political subdivision to which the local law is applicable. Such local law, and all amendments thereto, shall become effective only if approved in a special election by a majority of the qualified voters voting of each political subdivision directly affected, which special election shall be held as provided in that local law, but in conformity with the requirements for special elections pursuant to Title 21.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-22, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

36-44-23. Cumulative and supplemental powers.

Statute text

The powers provided by this chapter are intended by the General Assembly to be cumulative and supplemental to any powers heretofore provided by law for counties, municipalities, and consolidated governments of this state and not in lieu of any such heretofore existing powers.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-44-23, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 2/HB 63.)

——————————

CHAPTER 45

MUNICIPAL TRAINING

Article 1

In General.

36-45-1. Short title.

36-45-2. Legislative findings and intent.

36-45-3. Definitions.

36-45-4. Training of elected members of municipal governing authority.

36-45-5. Harold F. Holtz Municipal Training Institute.

36-45-6 through 36-45-8. [Repealed].

36-45-9. Report on accomplishments of institute.

Article 2

Clerks of Governing Authorities of Municipalities.

36-45-20. Training course.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 359 (1990).

——————————

ARTICLE 1

IN GENERAL

36-45-1. Short title.

Statute text

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Municipal Training Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter".

36-45-2. Legislative findings and intent.

Statute text

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the citizens of this state to require newly elected members of a municipal governing authority to attend a course of training and education on matters pertaining to the administration and operation of municipal government. The purpose of such course shall be to instruct such individuals in the powers, duties, and responsibilities of their positions of public trust.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.)

36-45-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Institute" means the Harold F. Holtz Municipal Training Institute.

(2) "Municipal governing authority" means the governing authority of a municipal corporation.

(3) "State" means the State of Georgia and any department, board, bureau, commission, or other agency thereof.

(4) "Vinson Institute" means the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 860, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" in the introductory language.

36-45-4. Training of elected members of municipal governing authority.

Statute text

(a) All persons elected as members of a municipal governing authority who were not serving as members of a municipal governing authority on July 1, 1990, shall enroll in, attend, and satisfactorily complete a course of training and education on matters pertaining to the administration and operations of municipal governments. Such course of training and education shall include, but not be limited to, orientation in local government finance and budgeting; methods of taxation; planning; public works and utilities; parks and recreation; environmental management; public safety; personnel management; responsiveness to the community; the ethics, duties, and responsibilities of members of a municipal governing authority or a chief executive officer; and such other matters as may be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Vinson Institute.

(b) All expenses incurred by a newly elected member of a municipal governing authority related to the course of training and education authorized and required by subsection (a) of this Code section, including the reasonable costs of housing, travel, and meals, shall be paid from public funds appropriated for such purposes. All expenses not paid for by state funds shall be paid from municipal funds by the municipal governing authority whose newly elected member or members shall attend such course.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.)

36-45-5. Harold F. Holtz Municipal Training Institute.

Statute text

(a) There is created and established the Harold F. Holtz Municipal Training Institute. Except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 36-45-4 and 36-45-20, all costs of operating and conducting the institute shall be paid for from public funds appropriated for such purposes.

(b) The Vinson Institute shall establish, in consultation with the Georgia Municipal Association, a committee of elected municipal officials to design, implement, and administer the course of training and education required by Code Sections 36-45-4 and 36-45-20.

(c) The course of training and education required by Code Sections 36-45-4 and 36-45-20 shall be conducted by the institute under such rules, regulations, procedures, policies, requirements, and standards as prescribed from time to time by the committee established pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

(d) The committee established pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall establish guidelines and procedures to permit any person elected or appointed as a member of a municipal governing authority after January 1 of a calendar year or any person who is unable to attend or complete the course of training and education when offered by the institute due to medical disability, providential cause, or any other reason deemed sufficient by such committee, to comply with the requirements of Code Sections 36-45-4 and 36-45-20.

(e) The committee established pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall perform such other duties and have such other powers and authority as may be necessary and proper or as prescribed by general law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1899, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 860, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 36/HB 95.)

36-45-6 through 36-45-8.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1, effective May 17, 2004.

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, these Code sections were "reserved" following their repeal by Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.

Editor's notes. - These Code sections were based on Code 1981, §§ 36-45-6 through 36-45-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1899, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 860, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 637, § 1.

36-45-9. Report on accomplishments of institute.

Statute text

On or before February 1 of each year, the Vinson Institute shall file a report to the Governor, the chairperson of the Senate State and Local Governmental Operations Committee, and the chairperson of the House Committee on State Planning and Community Affairs. The report shall include a summary of the accomplishments of the institute during the preceding calendar year, including, but not limited to, the total number of members of a municipal governing authority who attended the course of training and education offered by the institute; an outline of the institute's programs for the current calendar year; an evaluation of the programs and services offered by the institute; and recommendations, if any, for legislation as may be necessary to improve the programs and services offered by the institute.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1642, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.)

——————————

ARTICLE 2

CLERKS OF GOVERNING AUTHORITIES OF MUNICIPALITIES

36-45-20. Training course.

Statute text

(a) For purposes of this article, the term "clerk of the governing authority of a municipality" means an individual holding the office of city clerk pursuant to a municipal charter and who is normally employed in that capacity for 40 hours per week.

(b) Any person hired or appointed to serve as the clerk of the governing authority of a municipality shall attend and complete a course of training on matters pertaining to the basic performance of his or her official duties. A city official who is an acting city clerk or who carries the dual responsibilities of both city manager and city clerk is exempt from such training.

(c) The personnel of the Carl Vinson Institute of Government are authorized to work with the members of the Georgia Municipal Clerks and Finance Officers Association and the Georgia Municipal Association in establishing and operating the training course provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

(d) All reasonable expenses of attending the training course required by this Code section shall be paid from funds appropriated by the municipal governing authority for such purposes.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-45-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1899, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1997, p. 860, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 983, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 46

THROUGH 59

Reserved

——————————

PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO COUNTIES AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS

——————————

CHAPTER 60

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec.

36-60-1. Licensing of self-service motor fuel dispensing pumps; penalty for operation without license or attendant.

36-60-2. Contracts to provide industrial waste water treatment services.

36-60-3. Restriction of adult bookstores and movie houses to certain areas.

36-60-4. Removal of junked motor vehicles; adoption of ordinances; authority to contract for removal.

36-60-5. Installation of road grates to accommodate bicycles.

36-60-6. Utilization of federal work authorization program; "employee" defined; issuance of license; evidence of state licensure; annual reporting; standardized form affidavit; violation; investigations.

36-60-6.1. Preservation and protection of abandoned or unmaintained cemeteries [Repealed].

36-60-7. Use of excess proceeds of bonds issued to match state and federal allocations for hospital.

36-60-8. Audit of county or municipal corporation or units thereof.

36-60-9. Investigation of business for issuance of county or municipal license; criminal sanction for violation.

36-60-10. Annual meeting and agreement between county and city representatives as to services in portion of city within county.

36-60-11. Attorney General to receive a copy of any submission to the United States Department of Justice pursuant to federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 [Repealed].

36-60-12. Electronic security systems; installation, service, operation, sale, or lease by counties or municipal corporations.

36-60-13. Multiyear lease, purchase, or lease-purchase contracts.

36-60-14. Authority to enter into certain one-year, or less, contracts; exception.

36-60-15. Property subject to contract for lease purchase or installment purchase.

36-60-15.1. Operation and maintenance of water treatment systems by private entities.

36-60-16. Separate approval of municipal and county consolidation by referendum.

36-60-17. Water supplier's cut off of water to property because of indebtedness of prior owner, occupant, or lessee prohibited; records required; statement of past due amounts; limited liens for unpaid charges for water, gas, sewerage service, or electricity.

36-60-17.1. Localities prohibited from requiring connection with or use of water supplied by a public water system except when other water unfit; charges or fees for services made available but not used prohibited; applicability.

36-60-17.2. Limited exemption from storm water fees.

36-60-18. Obtaining real property within adjoining county which will be exchanged for federal property.

36-60-19. Dispatch centers; required training for communications officers; exceptions; penalty for noncompliance.

36-60-20. Political subdivisions have no liability for losses from any failure or malfunction of computer software.

36-60-21. Contracts with private companies to construct and operate private toll roads and bridges to facilitate public transportation without additional tax revenues.

36-60-22. Rock quarry operations prohibited under certain circumstances.

36-60-23. Volunteer firefighters for counties and municipalities.

36-60-24. Sale or use or ignition of consumer fireworks products.

36-60-25. Certificates of public necessity and convenience and medallions for taxicabs.

36-60-26. Unlawful to issue backdated license, permit, or other authorizing document; documents issued in violation void in entirety; criminal penalty for violations.

Annotations

Cross references. - Counties and municipalities generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX.

Special elections in counties and municipalities pertaining to prohibition of package sale of distilled spirits, § 3-4-40 et seq.

Creation, powers, and authority of municipal, county, and other housing authorities, § 8-3-1 et seq.

Duty of counties and municipalities to regulate activities which may result in soil erosion or sedimentation of waters and lands, § 12-7-4.

Powers and duties of local fire departments, T. 25, C. 3.

County and municipal ordinances relating to inspection of meat, poultry, or dairy products, § 26-2-212.

Ineligibility of county and municipal officials to serve as members of General Assembly, § 28-1-13.

County and municipal hospital authorities, § 31-7-70 et seq.

Acquisition of property by counties, municipalities and others for transportation purposes generally, T. 32, C. 3.

Group self-insurance programs for provision of workers' compensation benefits for municipal and county employees, § 34-9-150 et seq.

Local organizations for emergency management, § 38-3-27 et seq.

Effect of applicable state laws on powers of counties and municipalities to regulate use of streets and highways under their jurisdiction, § 40-6-370 et seq.

Regulation of business of dealers in precious metals and gems, T. 43, C. 37.

Prohibition against requiring municipal or county officers or employees to reside within boundaries of municipality or county, § 45-2-5.

Agreements between state revenue commissioner and counties or municipalities for purpose of collection by commissioner of tax levied by county or municipality when tax is also levied and collected by commissioner for state, § 48-2-10.

County and municipal income taxes, § 48-7-140 et seq.

Joint county and municipal sales and use tax, § 48-8-80 et seq.

General authority of counties and municipalities with regard to specific, business, and occupation taxes, T. 48, C. 13.

Power of Department of Administrative Services to permit local political subdivisions to purchase supplies through state, § 50-5-100 et seq.

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

36-60-1. Licensing of self-service motor fuel dispensing pumps; penalty for operation without license or attendant.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of each county and municipal corporation is authorized to license the operation of self-service motor fuel dispensing pumps and to charge a fee for each license. If the governing authority determines that the operation of self-service motor fuel dispensing pumps will not be injurious to the health or welfare of the residents of the political jurisdiction affected, it shall grant a license to any applicant not otherwise disqualified by law who makes application on a form prescribed by the governing authority. The license shall be effective from January 1 to December 31 of each year.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to operate a self-service motor fuel dispensing pump unless an attendant is present at the pump's location and such person, firm, or corporation has obtained a valid license from the governing authority of the political jurisdiction affected. Any person, firm, or corporation violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) This Code section shall not apply to motor fuel dispensing units which are not open to the public.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 683, §§ 1-3.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Dispensing of gasoline at self-service pumps to holders of special disability permits, § 10-1-164.1.

Motor fuel taxes generally, § 48-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews. - For article as to the power of Georgia local governments to regulate the trades and occupations of its citizens, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 115 (1974).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Statute is not unconstitutional. - Statute's enactment was a proper exercise of the police power, and the statute's delegation on a local option basis of police power to the local governing authorities was a proper, and not unconstitutional, delegation. Stop-N-Go Markets of Ga., Inc. v. City of Clarkston, 238 Ga. 307, 232 S.E.2d 906 (1977).

Cited in J & L Oil Co. v. City of Carrollton, 230 Ga. 817, 199 S.E.2d 190 (1973).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 38 Am. Jur. 2d, Garages, and Filling and Parking Stations, §§ 12, 13, 122, 126.

C.J.S. - 53 C.J.S., Licenses, § 142. 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, §§ 63, 125 et seq.

ALR. - Public regulation or authorization of gasoline filling stations, 18 A.L.R. 101; 29 A.L.R. 450; 34 A.L.R. 507; 42 A.L.R. 978; 49 A.L.R. 767; 55 A.L.R. 256; 79 A.L.R. 918; 96 A.L.R. 1337.

Rights and remedies of parties in respect to lease of filling station, 83 A.L.R. 1416; 126 A.L.R. 1375.

Automobile gas filling or supply station as a nuisance, 124 A.L.R. 383.

Right of one who acquires title to, or other interest in, real property to benefit of a license previously issued by the public, permitting use of property for a specified purpose, 131 A.L.R. 1339.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance regulating or prohibiting self-service gasoline filling stations, 46 A.L.R.3d 1393.

36-60-2. Contracts to provide industrial waste water treatment services.

Statute text

In order to comply with applicable state and federal water pollution control standards and to be eligible for grants-in-aid or other allotments, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each municipal corporation and each county of this state is authorized, in the discretion of its governing authority, to enter into valid and binding contracts with each other and with private persons, firms, associations, or corporations, for any period of time not to exceed 50 years, to provide industrial waste water treatment services to such private persons, firms, associations, or corporations, provided that such contracts shall provide that the charge for the services shall never be less than the actual cost to the municipal corporation or county for providing the services.

History

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 617, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Control of water pollution and surface-water use generally, § 12-5-20 et seq.

Regulation of solid waste handling, disposal, and treatment facilities, § 12-8-20 et seq.

Contracts relating to provision of solid waste handling services, § 12-8-77.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Exception to rule against binding successors in office. - O.C.G.A. § 36-60-2, permitting municipalities to enter into multi-year contracts to provide industrial waste water treatment services, provides an explicit statutory exception to O.C.G.A. § 36-30-3 and allows contracts between municipalities and certain private entities for periods up to 50 years. The contract must enable the municipality to comply with the state and federal pollution standards and to receive public allotments. In addition, the contract must comply with the statutory requirement that the private corporation be charged a rate never less than the actual cost to the municipality. A contract meeting the above requirements would not violate the statutory prohibition against binding successors in office. 1992 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 92-4.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 61B Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, §§ 148 et seq., 185 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1169, 1171.

ALR. - Validity and construction of anti-water pollution statutes or ordinances, 32 A.L.R.3d 215.

36-60-3. Restriction of adult bookstores and movie houses to certain areas.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Adult bookstore" means any commercial establishment in which is offered for sale any book or publication, film, or other medium which depicts sexually explicit nudity or sexual conduct.

(2) "Adult movie house" means any movie theater which on a regular, continuing basis shows films rated "X" by the Motion Picture Coding Association of America or any movie theater which presents for public viewing on a regular, continuing basis so-called "adult films" depicting sexual conduct.

(3) "Explicit media outlet" means any commercial establishment which has an inventory of goods that is composed of at least 50 percent of books, pamphlets, magazines, or other printed publications, films, or other media which depict sexually explicit nudity or sexual conduct.

(4) "Sexual conduct" means acts of masturbation, homosexuality, sodomy, sexual intercourse, or physical contact with a person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or, if such person is female, breast which, to the average person, applying contemporary community standards, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value and predominantly appeals to the prurient interest, that is, a shameful or morbid interest in nudity or sex.

(5) "Sexually explicit nudity" means a state of undress so as to expose the human male or female genitals or pubic area with less than a full opaque covering or the depiction of covered or uncovered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state which, to the average person, applying contemporary community standards, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value and predominantly appeals to the prurient interest, that is, a shameful or morbid interest in nudity or sex.

(b) The governing authority of each county and municipal corporation is authorized to enact, for their respective jurisdictions, ordinances which shall have the effect of restricting the operation of adult bookstores, explicit media outlets, and adult movie houses to areas zoned for commercial or industrial purposes; provided, however, that no explicit media outlet or adult movie house shall be located within 1,000 feet of any school building, school grounds, college campus, public place of worship, or area zoned primarily for residential purposes. As used in this subsection, the term "school building" shall apply only to public or private school buildings. The distance requirement provided in this subsection for explicit media outlets and adult movie houses shall not apply to said locations which hold lawful permits or business licenses on July 1, 1997. In determining the distance requirements provided for in this Code section, the measurement shall be from the closest property line on which the adult bookstore, explicit media outlet, or adult movie house is located to the closest property line on which the school, college, religious institution, public place of worship, or area zoned primarily for residential purposes is located. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to prohibit the adoption by the governing authority of any county or municipality of restrictions relating to the location of adult bookstores, explicit media outlets, and adult movie houses which are more stringent than the requirements of this Code section.

(c) Any person, firm, or corporation violating any ordinance enacted pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of operation in violation shall be deemed a separate offense.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 888, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1997, p. 855, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Distribution of obscene materials, distribution of materials depicting nudity or sexual conduct, § 16-12-80 et seq.

Employment, use, persuasion, inducement, enticement, or coercion of minor to engage in sexual conduct for a visual medium or performance, § 16-12-100.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, in the fourth sentence of subsection (b), a comma was inserted following "worship" and "residential" was substituted for "residental".

Law reviews. - For article, "Evil Angel Eulogy: Reflections on the Passing of the Obscenity Defense in Copyright," see 20 J. Intell. Prop. L. 209 (2013).

For note, "Defending Against a Charge of Obscenity in the Internet Age: How Google Searches Can Illuminate Miller's 'Contemporary Community Standards,'" see 26 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1029 (2010).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in 106 Forsyth Corp. v. Bishop, 482 F.2d 280 (5th Cir. 1973); Sanders v. State, 231 Ga. 608, 203 S.E.2d 153 (1974); Coleman v. Bradford, 238 Ga. 505, 233 S.E.2d 764 (1977).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, §§ 125, 127, 449.

ALR. - Right of one who acquires title to, or other interest in, real property to benefit of a license previously issued by the public, permitting use of property for a specified purpose, 131 A.L.R. 1339.

Validity of statutes or ordinances requiring sex-oriented businesses to obtain operating licenses, 8 A.L.R.4th 130.

36-60-4. Removal of junked motor vehicles; adoption of ordinances; authority to contract for removal.

Statute text

(a) Each county and municipal corporation shall have the authority to provide by ordinance for the removal and disposal of any discarded, dismantled, wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or junked motor vehicles or parts thereof, when requested by the owner or when such motor vehicles are in such a condition that they constitute a health hazard or unsightly nuisance, notwithstanding the fact that such motor vehicles may be located upon private property.

(b) Each county and municipal corporation, in addition to the specific powers conferred upon it by this Code section, is vested with such additional powers as shall be necessary to carry out the purposes of this Code section and shall have the authority to adopt all reasonable ordinances in order to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this Code section. Additionally, each county and municipality shall have the power and authority to contract with private individuals and firms for the removal of discarded, dismantled, wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or junked motor vehicles or parts thereof.

(c) Nothing contained within this Code section shall be deemed to apply to any motor vehicle which is located within the premises of any junkyard complying with the laws of this state relating to the licensing and regulating of motor vehicle junkyards.

History

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 670, §§ 1-3.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Control of junkyards, § 32-6-240 et seq.

Disposition of abandoned motor vehicles, T. 40, C. 11.

Removal and storage by landowners of improperly parked vehicles, § 44-1-13.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Cherokee County v. Hause, 229 Ga. App. 578, 494 S.E.2d 234 (1997).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 398, 400 et seq.

C.J.S. - 101A C.J.S., Zoning and Land Planning, § 139.

36-60-5. Installation of road grates to accommodate bicycles.

Statute text

After July 1, 1978, each county and municipal corporation shall install all newly located grates upon any public roadway so as to accommodate bicycles traveling on the public road parallel to the lane of travel of vehicles proceeding over such roadways, except that this Code section shall not apply to limited access highways or other streets or roads on which bicycle travel is prohibited.

History

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 257, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Existing sewer grates which have been adjusted due to street resurfacing are not considered newly located grates for the purpose of installing bicycle safe grates. DeWaters v. City of Atlanta, 169 Ga. App. 41, 311 S.E.2d 232 (1983).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, § 448.

36-60-6. Utilization of federal work authorization program; "employee" defined; issuance of license; evidence of state licensure; annual reporting; standardized form affidavit; violation; investigations.

Statute text

(a) Every private employer with more than ten employees shall register with and utilize the federal work authorization program, as defined by Code Section 13-10-90. The requirements of this subsection shall be effective on January 1, 2012, as to employers with 500 or more employees, on July 1, 2012, as to employers with 100 or more employees but fewer than 500 employees, and on July 1, 2013, as to employers with more than ten employees but fewer than 100 employees.

(b) For purposes of this Code section, the term "employee" shall have the same meaning as set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1.1) of Code Section 48-13-5, provided that such person is also employed to work not less than 35 hours per week.

(c) Before any county or municipal corporation issues a business license, occupational tax certificate, or other document required to operate a business to any person engaged in a profession or business required to be licensed by the state under Title 43, the person shall provide evidence of such licensure to the appropriate agency of the county or municipal corporation that issues business licenses. No business license, occupational tax certificate, or other document required to operate a business shall be issued to any person subject to licensure under Title 43 without evidence of such licensure being presented.

(d) (1) Before any county or municipal corporation issues a business license, occupational tax certificate, or other document required to operate a business to any person, the person shall provide evidence that he or she is authorized to use the federal work authorization program or evidence that the provisions of this Code section do not apply. Evidence of such use shall be in the form of an affidavit as provided by the Attorney General in subsection (f) of this Code section attesting that he or she utilizes the federal work authorization program in accordance with federal regulations or that he or she employs fewer than 11 employees or otherwise does not fall within the requirements of this Code section. Whether an employer is exempt from using the federal work authorization program as required by this Code section shall be determined by the number of employees employed by such employer on January 1 of the year during which the affidavit is submitted. The affidavit shall include the employer's federally assigned employment eligibility verification system user number and the date of authority for use. The requirements of this subsection shall be effective on January 1, 2012, as to employers with 500 or more employees, on July 1, 2012, as to employers with 100 or more employees but fewer than 500 employees, and on July 1, 2013, as to employers with more than ten employees but fewer than 100 employees.

(2) Upon satisfying the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection, for all subsequent renewals of a business license, occupation tax certificate, or other document, the person shall submit to the county or municipality his or her federal work authorization user number or assert that he or she is exempt from this requirement, provided that the federal work authorization user number provided for the renewal is the same federal work authorization user number as provided in the affidavit under paragraph (1) of this subsection. If the federal work authorization user number is different than the federal work authorization user number provided in the affidavit under paragraph (1) of this subsection, then the person shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (g) of this Code section.

(e) Counties and municipal corporations subject to the requirements of this Code section shall provide an annual report to the Department of Audits and Accounts pursuant to Code Section 50-36-4 as proof of compliance with this Code section. Subject to funding, the Department of Audits and Accounts shall annually conduct an audit of no fewer than 20 percent of such reporting agencies.

(f) In order to assist private businesses and counties and municipal corporations in complying with the provisions of this Code section, the Attorney General shall provide a standardized form affidavit which shall be used as acceptable evidence demonstrating use of the federal employment eligibility verification system or that the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section do not apply to the applicant. The form affidavit shall be posted by the Attorney General on the Department of Law's official website no later than January 1, 2012.

(g) Once an applicant for a business license, occupational tax certificate, or other document required to operate a business has submitted an affidavit with a federally assigned employment eligibility verification system user number, he or she shall not be authorized to submit a renewal application using a new or different federally assigned employment eligibility verification system user number, unless accompanied by a sworn document explaining the reason such applicant obtained a new or different federally assigned employment eligibility verification system user number.

(h) Any person presenting false or misleading evidence of state licensure shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any government official or employee knowingly acting in violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that any person who knowingly submits a false or misleading affidavit pursuant to this Code section shall be guilty of submitting a false document in violation of Code Section 16-10-20. It shall be a defense to a violation of this Code section that such person acted in good faith and made a reasonable attempt to comply with the requirements of this Code section.

(i) Documents required by this Code section may be submitted electronically, provided the submission complies with Chapter 12 of Title 10.

(j) The Attorney General shall be authorized to conduct an investigation and bring any criminal or civil action he or she deems necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this Code section. The Attorney General shall provide an employer who is found to have committed a good faith violation of this Code section 30 days to demonstrate to the Attorney General that such employer has come into compliance with this Code section. During the course of any investigation of violations of this Code section, the Attorney General shall also investigate potential violations of Code Section 16-9-121.1 by employees that may have led to violations of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1553, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 12/HB 87; Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 4/SB 160.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-60-6, pertaining to permits for disturbing burial places in land development, was based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 318, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 387, § 1, and was repealed and made reserved by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 1, effective April 11, 1991.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.'"

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability, and provides, in part, that: "(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

"(c) The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights."

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 2/SB 160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "It is the intent of the General Assembly that all public employers and contractors at every tier and level use the federal work authorization program on all projects, jobs, and work resulting from any bid or contract and that every public employer and contractor working for a public employer take all possible steps to ensure that a legal and eligible workforce is utilized in accordance with federal immigration and employment."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 35 (2011). For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 173 (2013).

36-60-6.1. Preservation and protection of abandoned or unmaintained cemeteries.

Statute text

Repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 2, effective April 11, 1991.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 36.

36-60-7. Use of excess proceeds of bonds issued to match state and federal allocations for hospital.

Statute text

When any county or municipal corporation of this state has voted, issued, and sold, or hereafter votes, issues, and sells bonds with the proceeds of which to match state and federal allocations and contributions and to build and equip a hospital in such county or municipal corporation, and because of increased contributions thereto by the state or the federal government the cost thereof is less than the architects or engineers estimate, or for other reasons there is an excess over the cost to such county or municipal corporation in the proceeds of the sale of such bonds, such county or municipal corporation, acting by and through its governing authority, may apply such excess to the cost of supplies for and of opening and operating such hospital or to the cost of constructing and equipping a nurses' home to be used in connection therewith. Such excess of bond issues may be used and so applied whether the hospital is built and equipped through a contract made by the county or municipal corporation directly or is made through a hospital authority under Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31, of which such county or municipal corporation is a participating unit.

History

(Ga. L. 1952, p. 151, §§ 1, 2.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Hospital authorities, § 31-7-70 et seq.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Power of municipal corporation to provide hospital, 25 A.L.R. 612.

36-60-8. Audit of county or municipal corporation or units thereof.

Statute text
